Other/Precision Software/Precision Lang Suite/Editor/Extras/Hunspell/Dictionaries/la.aff
SFX B o       ebatis          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       ebatisque       [^ei]o    
SFX B o       ebatisne        [^ei]o    
SFX B o       ebatisve        [^ei]o    
SFX B o       ebant           [^ei]o    
SFX B o       ebantque        [^ei]o    
SFX B o       ebantne         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       ebantve         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       am              [^ei]o    
SFX B o       amque           [^ei]o    
SFX B o       amne            [^ei]o    
SFX B o       amve            [^ei]o    
SFX B o       es              [^ei]o    
SFX B o       esque           [^ei]o    
SFX B o       esne            [^ei]o    
SFX B o       esve            [^ei]o    
SFX B o       et              [^ei]o    
SFX B o       etque           [^ei]o    
SFX B o       etne            [^ei]o    
SFX B o       etve            [^ei]o    
SFX B o       emus            [^ei]o    
SFX B o       emusque         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       emusne          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       emusve          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       etis            [^ei]o    
SFX B o       etisque         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       etisne          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       etisve          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       ent             [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entque          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entne           [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entve           [^ei]o    
SFX B o       as              [^ei]o    
SFX B o       asque           [^ei]o    
SFX B o       asne            [^ei]o    
SFX B o       asve            [^ei]o    
SFX B o       at              [^ei]o    
SFX B o       atque           [^ei]o    
SFX B o       atne            [^ei]o    
SFX B o       atve            [^ei]o    
SFX B o       amus            [^ei]o    
SFX B o       amusque         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       amusne          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       amusve          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       atis            [^ei]o    
SFX B o       atisque         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       atisne          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       atisve          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       ant             [^ei]o    
SFX B o       antque          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       antne           [^ei]o    
SFX B o       antve           [^ei]o    
SFX B o       erem            [^ei]o    
SFX B o       eremque         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       eremne          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       eremve          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       eres            [^ei]o    
SFX B o       eresque         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       eresne          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       eresve          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       eret            [^ei]o    
SFX B o       eretque         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       eretne          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       eretve          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       eremus          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       eremusque       [^ei]o    
SFX B o       eremusne        [^ei]o    
SFX B o       eremusve        [^ei]o    
SFX B o       eretis          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       eretisque       [^ei]o    
SFX B o       eretisne        [^ei]o    
SFX B o       eretisve        [^ei]o    
SFX B o       erent           [^ei]o    
SFX B o       erentque        [^ei]o    
SFX B o       erentne         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       erentve         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       e               [^ei]o    
SFX B o       eque            [^ei]o    
SFX B o       ene             [^ei]o    
SFX B o       eve             [^ei]o    
SFX B o       ite             [^ei]o    
SFX B o       iteque          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       itene           [^ei]o    
SFX B o       iteve           [^ei]o    
SFX B o       ito             [^ei]o    
SFX B o       itoque          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       itone           [^ei]o    
SFX B o       itove           [^ei]o    
SFX B o       itote           [^ei]o    
SFX B o       itoteque        [^ei]o    
SFX B o       itotene         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       itoteve         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       unto            [^ei]o    
SFX B o       untoque         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       untone          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       untove          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       ere             [^ei]o    
SFX B o       ereque          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       erene           [^ei]o    
SFX B o       ereve           [^ei]o    
SFX B o       endum           [^ei]o    
SFX B o       endumque        [^ei]o    
SFX B o       endumne         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       endumve         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       endi            [^ei]o    
SFX B o       endique         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       endine          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       endive          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       endo            [^ei]o    
SFX B o       endoque         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       endone          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       endove          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       ens             [^ei]o    
SFX B o       ensque          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       ensne           [^ei]o    
SFX B o       ensve           [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entem           [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entemque        [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entemne         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entemve         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entis           [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entisque        [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entisne         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entisve         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       enti            [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entique         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entine          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entive          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       ente            [^ei]o    
SFX B o       enteque         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entene          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       enteve          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entes           [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entesque        [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entesne         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entesve         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entium          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entiumque       [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entiumne        [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entiumve        [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entibus         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entibusque      [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entibusne       [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entibusve       [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entia           [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entiaque        [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entiane         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       entiave         [^ei]o    
SFX B 0       r               [^ei]o    
SFX B 0       rque            [^ei]o    
SFX B 0       rne             [^ei]o    
SFX B 0       rve             [^ei]o    
SFX B o       eris            [^ei]o    
SFX B o       erisque         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       erisne          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       erisve          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       itur            [^ei]o    
SFX B o       iturque         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       iturne          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       iturve          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       imur            [^ei]o    
SFX B o       imurque         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       imurne          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       imurve          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       imini           [^ei]o    
SFX B o       iminique        [^ei]o    
SFX B o       iminine         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       iminive         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       untur           [^ei]o    
SFX B o       unturque        [^ei]o    
SFX B o       unturne         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       unturve         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       ebar            [^ei]o    
SFX B o       ebarque         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       ebarne          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       ebarve          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       ebaris          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       ebarisque       [^ei]o    
SFX B o       ebarisne        [^ei]o    
SFX B o       ebarisve        [^ei]o    
SFX B o       ebatur          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       ebaturque       [^ei]o    
SFX B o       ebaturne        [^ei]o    
SFX B o       ebaturve        [^ei]o    
SFX B o       ebamur          [^ei]o    
SFX B o       ebamurque       [^ei]o    
SFX B o       ebamurne        [^ei]o    
SFX B o       ebamurve        [^ei]o    
SFX B o       ebamini         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       ebaminique      [^ei]o    
SFX B o       ebaminine       [^ei]o    
SFX B o       ebaminive       [^ei]o    
SFX B o       ebantur         [^ei]o    
SFX B o       ebanturque      [^ei]o    
SFX B o       ebanturne       [^ei]o    
