Other/Precision Software/Precision Lang Suite/Editor/Extras/Hunspell/Dictionaries/la.dic
abdo/B
abigo/B
aboleo/B
abscedo/B
absisto/B
abstineo/B
abutor/B
accido/B
accresco/B
acuo/B
adcurro/B
adduco/B
adfingo/B
adgero/B
adhaeresco/B
adigo/B
adiungo/B
adloquor/B
admoneo/B
adnuo/B
adolesco/B
adpingo/B
adprimo/B
adquiro/B
adripio/B
adsequor/B
adsisto/B
adstringo/B
adsumo/B
adtingo/B
adurgeo/B
adverto/B
advesperesco/B
aequivaleo/B
affluo/B
agnosco/B
albeo/B
allicio/B
alludo/B
ambedo/B
amitto/B
amplector/B
animadverto/B
annuo/B
antecello/B
antepono/B
appeto/B
appono/B
arceo/B
ardesco/B
arguo/B
arripio/B
ascribo/B
aspicio/B
assideo/B
assuefacio/B
assumo/B
astruo/B
attineo/B
attollo/B
attulo/B
aufugio/B
augesco/B
averto/B
caedo/B
caleo/B
canesco/B
capio/B
carpo/B
censeo/B
cingo/B
circumcingo/B
circumduco/B
circumfundo/B
circumpono/B
circumsisto/B
circunscribo/B
coalesco/B
coerceo/B
coincido/B
colluceo/B
comminiscor/B
commoveo/B
compesco/B
compleo/B
comprimo/B
concido/B
concresco/B
condico/B
confido/B
confluo/B
congemo/B
coniicio/B
conloquor/B
conqueror/BS
conscribo/B
consisto/B
consuesco/B
contabesco/B
contexo/B
contraho/B
contundo/B
convolvo/B
corrodo/B
cresco/B
decerno/B
decumbo/B
defendo/B
deflecto/B
dego/B
deleo/ABPS
demergo/B
denobo/B
dependo/B
deprehendo/B
derigo/B
desero/B
despicio/B
desumo/B
detineo/B
detumesco/B
deverto/B
dido/B
diffleo/B
digredior/B
dilvo/B
dirigo/B
discindo/B
discurro/B
dispergo/B
disrumpo/B
dissuadeo/B
divendo/B
dulcesco/B
edo/B
efficio/B
effugio/B
egero/B
elicio/B
elvo/B
emorior/BS
enitor/B
escendo/B
evello/B
exardeo/B
excerpo/B
excolo/B
exedo/B
existo/B
expendo/B
explodo/B
expungo/B
exsolvo/B
exsurgo/B
exterreo/B
extorqueo/B
exuo/B
facio/B
fateor/B
fero/B
fido/B
fingo/B
floreo/B
frango/B
frigeo/B
fundo/ABPS
gemo/B
gero/B
gradior/B
hebesco/B
horresco/B
icio/B
illabor/B
illino/B
imbibo/B
imminuo/B
immito/B
impendo/B
impingo/B
impluo/B
inbuo/B
incesso/B
incipio/B
incresco/B
indico/ABPS
indo/B
induo/B
inflecto/B
infringo/B
ingemo/B
ingredior/B
inhaeresco/B
iniungo/B
inludo/B
innecto/B
inquiro/B
inscendo/B
insequor/B
insisto/B
instituo/B
insuesco/B
intego/B
intercedo/B
intercipio/B
interficio/B
intericio/B
interluo/B
interpono/B
interviso/B
intremesco/B
introgredior/B
intrudo/B
intumesco/B
inverto/B
involvo/B
irrumpo/B
labasco/B
lacteo/B
languesco/B
lentesco/B
liquor/BS
luceo/B
luo/B
maledico/B
manumitto/B
mereo/B
metuo/B
misereor/BS
moneo/B
mulceo/B
nascor/B
nigresco/B
nolo/Bq
nubo/B
obicio/B
obloquor/B
obpeto/B
obsequor/B
obstrepo/B
obstruo/B
obtero/B
obverto/B
occido/B
occulo/B
offero/Bq
oggero/B
oppleo/B
optingo/B
paeniteo/B
parco/B
pasco/B
patesco/B
pavesco/B
pello/B
perago/B
percrebresco/B
perdisco/B
perduco/B
perfringo/B
perfungor/B
perimo/B
permaneo/B
permulceo/B
perpendo/B
perrumpo/B
persisto/B
perspicio/B
pertimesco/B
peruro/B
perverto/B
pinso/B
plecto/B
polleo/B
porrigo/B
possido/B
posthabeo/B
praecedo/B
praecingo/B
praecludo/B
praeficio/B
praefulgeo/B
praehibeo/B
praemitto/B
praependeo/B
praepolleo/B
praesideo/B
praeterfluo/B
praetexo/B
praeverto/B
prendo/B
procudo/B
prodo/B
proficiscor/B
profluo/B
progigno/B
proiicio/B
promereo/B
promoveo/B
proripio/B
proscribo/B
prospicio/B
protendo/B
proterreo/B
provolvo/B
pungo/B
quaero/B
quiesco/B
reccido/B
recido/B
recolligo/B
recurro/B
redarguo/B
redoleo/B
reflecto/B
refringo/B
regredior/B
relanguesco/B
reluceo/B
remulceo/B
reparco/B
rependo/B
repo/B
reprehendo/B
requiro/B
resido/B
respergo/B
respuo/B
retendo/B
retorqueo/B
retribuo/B
revello/B
revivisco/B
rideo/B
rubesco/B
salveo/B
satisfacio/B
scisco/B
secerno/B
sedeo/B
semoveo/B
sero/B
sileo/B
solvo/B
spicio/B
squaleo/B
sterto/B
struo/B
stupefacio/B
subduco/B
subigo/B
subiungo/B
submergo/B
subrideo/B
subscribo/B
subsisto/B
subtaceo/B
subterhabeo/B
subverto/B
succido/B
succumbo/B
sufficio/B
suggredior/B
sumo/B
superiaceo/B
supersedeo/B
supertexo/B
surgo/B
suspicio/B
taceo/B
teneo/B
tergo/B
texo/B
tondeo/B
trado/B
traho/B
transcendo/B
transfero/Bq
transgredior/B
transmitto/B
transveho/B
tribuo/B
tumeo/B
ulciscor/B
ungo/B
uro/B
vado/B
vanesco/B
vereor/B
vescor/BS
videor/B
viresco/B
voveo/B
deleo/B
